Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-1953
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the
Step Up to Quality Child Care Act are to (1) provide accountability for public
funds invested in child care and early childhood education programs, (2) provide
a path to higher quality for child care and early childhood education programs,
(3) provide parents a tool by which to evaluate the quality of child care
and early childhood education programs, and (4) improve child development
and school readiness outcomes.

Laws 2013, LB507, § 2.
September 6, 2013